zh-TW: 上低音號閥門配置: 3 活塞; 4 活塞 (側按式); 4 活塞 (上按式); 其他
pt-BR: Configuração de válvulas do eufônio: 3 válvulas; 4 válvulas (ação lateral); 4 válvulas (ação superior); Outro
sv: Euphonium-ventilkonfiguration: 3 ventiler; 4 ventiler (sidoaktiverade); 4 ventiler (toppaktiverade); Övrigt
es: Configuración de válvulas del eufonio: 3 válvulas; 4 válvulas (acción lateral); 4 válvulas (acción superior); Otro
it: Configurazione della valvola dell'eufonio: 3 pistoni; 4 pistoni (ad azione laterale); 4 pistoni (ad azione superiore); Altro
fr: Configuration des pistons de l’euphonium: 3 pistons; 4 pistons (action latérale); 4 pistons (action supérieure); Autre
da: Euphonium-ventilkonfiguration: 3 ventiler; 4 ventiler (side-action); 4 ventiler (top-action); Andet
sk-SK: Konfigurácia ventilu eufónia: 3 ventily; 4 ventily (bočné); 4 ventily (horné); Iné
de: Ventilkonfiguration des Euphoniums: 3 Ventile; 4 Ventile (Side-Action); 4 Ventile (Top-Action); Sonstige
ru: Конфигурация клапанов эвфониума: 3 вентиля; 4 вентиля (бокового действия); 4 вентиля (верхнего действия); Другое
hu: Eufónium szelep konfiguráció: 3 szelepes; 4 szelepes (oldalsó működtetésű); 4 szelepes (felső működtetésű); Egyéb
th: รูปแบบการจัดวางวาล์วยูโฟเนียม: 3 วาล์ว; 4 วาล์ว (Side-action); 4 วาล์ว (Top-action); อื่นๆ
pl: Konfiguracja wentyli eufonium: 3 wentyle; 4 wentyle (mechanizm boczny); 4 wentyle (mechanizm górny); Inne
nl: Eufonium ventielconfiguratie: 3 ventielen; 4 ventielen (side-action); 4 ventielen (top-action); Overig
cs: Konfigurace eufoniového ventilu: 3 ventily; 4 ventily (boční stisk); 4 ventily (horní stisk); Ostatní
en: Euphonium valve configuration: 3 valves; 4 valves (side-action); 4 valves (top-action); Other
ko: 유포늄 밸브 구성: 3 밸브; 4 밸브(사이드 액션); 4 밸브(탑 액션); 기타
ja: ユーフォニアムバルブの構成: 3 バルブ; 4 バルブ (サイドアクション); 4 バルブ (トップアクション); その他
tr: Öfonyum valf konfigürasyonu: 3 valf; 4 valf (yandan basmalı); 4 valf (üstten basmalı); Diğer
hr-HR: Konfiguracija eufonijskog ventila: 3 ventila; 4 ventila (bočni mehanizam); 4 ventila (gornji mehanizam); Ostalo
vi: Cấu hình van kèn euphonium: 3 van; 4 van (bấm ngang); 4 van (bấm dọc); Khác
nb: Konfigurasjon av euphoniumventilen: 3 ventiler; 4 ventiler (sidemonterte); 4 ventiler (toppmonterte); Annet
fi: Baritonitorven venttiilit: 3 venttiiliä; 4 venttiiliä (sivuventtiilit); 4 venttiiliä (yläventtiilit); Muu
lt-LT: Eufonijos vožtuvų konfigūracija: 3 vožtuvai; 4 vožtuvai (šoninio veikimo); 4 vožtuvai (viršutinio veikimo); Kita
pt-PT: Configuração da válvula do eufónio: 3 pistões; 4 pistões (ação lateral); 4 pistões (ação superior); Outro
zh-CN: 上低音号阀门配置: 3 活塞; 4 活塞（侧按）; 4 活塞（顶按）; 其他
ro-RO: Configurația valvei eufoniu: 3 pistoane; 4 pistoane (acțiune laterală); 4 pistoane (acțiune superioară); Altele
sl-SI: Konfiguracija ventilov evfonija: 3 ventili; 4 ventili (stransko delovanje); 4 ventili (zgornje delovanje); Drugo
el: Διαμόρφωση βαλβίδας ευφωνίου: 3 έμβολα; 4 έμβολα (πλευρικής δράσης); 4 έμβολα (άνω δράσης); Άλλο
bg-BG: Конфигурация на клапаните на еуфониума: 3 вентила; 4 вентила (странично действие); 4 вентила (горно действие); Други